District of Columbia statutes.
24-403.02

Sentencing and good time credit for misdemeanors committed on or after August 5, 2000.

A sentence of incarceration, or of commitment pursuant to § 24-903, for a misdemeanor committed on or after August 5, 2000, shall be for a definite term, which shall not exceed the maximum term allowed by law. A person sentenced to incarceration, or to commitment pursuant to § 24-903, under this section, shall serve the term of incarceration or commitment specified in the sentence, less any time credited toward service of the sentence as provided in § 24-221.01 through § 24-221.05.

July 15, 1932, 47 Stat. 697, ch. 492, § 3b
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 8(b), 47 DCR 7249

History

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8(b) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 8(b) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 8(b) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).

Emergency Legislation